Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1130.
do enact as follows:SB1130,11Section 1. 5.01 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1130,3,825.01 (4) (a) If Except as provided under s. 7.62, if 2 or more candidates for the 3same office receive the greatest, but an equal number of votes, the winner shall be 4chosen by lot in the presence of the board of canvassers charged with the 5responsibility to determine the election, or in the case of an election for state or 6national office or metropolitan sewerage commissioner, if the commissioner is 7elected under s. 200.09 (11) (am), in the presence of the chairperson of the elections 8commission or the chairperson’s designee.SB1130,29Section 2. 5.01 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1130,4,2105.01 (4) (b) If Except as provided under s. 7.62, if, in a primary, 2 or more 11candidates receive an equal but not the greatest number of votes so that only one of 1those candidates with equal votes may advance to the final election, the choice shall 2similarly be made by drawing lots.SB1130,33Section 3. 5.01 (4) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1130,4,745.01 (4) (c) The For purposes of pars. (a) and (b), the candidates may, if all 5those tied for the same office are present, draw for themselves. Upon refusal or 6absence of any of the candidates, the board of canvassers shall appoint a competent 7person to draw, and upon the results declare and certify the winner.SB1130,48Section 4. 5.01 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1130,4,1695.01 (5) Election of governor and lieutenant governor. (a) In every 10general election to choose the governor and the lieutenant governor, each elector 11shall have a single vote applicable to both offices. The the persons receiving the 12greatest number of legal majority of highest-ranked votes cast jointly for them for 13governor and lieutenant governor shall be declared elected, and the canvassers 14shall so determine and certify if no persons receive a majority of highest-ranked 15votes cast jointly for governor and lieutenant governor, the election shall be 16determined under s. 7.62.SB1130,4,2117(b) In case If 2 or more slates have an equal and the highest number of votes 18for governor and lieutenant governor after the canvass under s. 7.62, the 2 houses of 19the legislature shall at the next annual session choose by joint ballot one of the 20slates so having an equal and the highest number of votes for governor and 21lieutenant governor.SB1130,522Section 5. 5.02 (19) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1130,5,215.02 (19) “Special election” means any election, other than those described in 2subs. (5), (12s), and (21), and (22), to fill vacancies or to conduct a referendum.SB1130,63Section 6. 5.02 (20r) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1130,5,645.02 (20r) “Special referendum” means any referendum held at a special 5election which is not held concurrently with the elections described in sub. (5), 6(12s), or (21), or (22).SB1130,77Section 7. 5.02 (22) of the statutes is repealed.SB1130,88Section 8. 5.05 (1) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB1130,5,1295.05 (1) (g) Make grants to counties and municipalities to update equipment 10and software, including the implementation of secure technologies, to administer 11ranked-choice voting under s. 5.20 and the canvass procedure for ranked-choice 12voting under s. 7.62.SB1130,913Section 9. 5.15 (6) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1130,6,17145.15 (6) (b) No later than 30 days before each election, the governing body of 15any municipality may by resolution combine 2 or more wards for voting purposes to 16facilitate using a common polling place. Whenever wards are so combined, the 17original ward numbers shall continue to be utilized for all official purposes. Except 18as otherwise authorized under this paragraph, every municipality having a 19population of 35,000 or more shall maintain separate returns for each ward so 20combined. In municipalities having a population of 35,000 or more, the governing 21body may provide in a resolution that returns for any ward having a population of 2220 or less be combined with returns for any adjacent ward, if the total population of 23the combined wards does not exceed the applicable population range under sub. (2) 1(b) for wards in that municipality. In municipalities having a population of less 2than 35,000, the governing body may provide in the resolution that returns shall be 3maintained only for each group of combined wards at any election. Whenever a 4governing body provides that returns shall be maintained only for combined wards 5under this paragraph, the municipality shall report separate results for each 6separate ballot required under ss. 5.58 5.60 to 5.64. The municipal clerk shall 7transmit a copy of the resolution to the county clerk of each county in which the 8municipality is contained. In municipalities having a population of less than 935,000, the resolution shall remain in effect for each election until modified or 10rescinded, or until a new division is made under this section. Whenever needed for 11purposes of this paragraph, the municipal clerk shall determine the population of 12each ward in his or her municipality. If the population of a ward cannot be 13determined from census results, the clerk shall determine the population of the 14smallest unit encompassing the entire ward that can be determined from census 15results. The clerk shall then divide the land area of the ward by the land area of 16that unit. The clerk shall then multiply that result by the population of the unit to 17determine the population of the ward for purposes of this paragraph.SB1130,1018Section 10. 5.20 of the statutes is created to read:SB1130,6,22195.20 Ranked-choice voting. (1) In this section, “ranked-choice voting” 20means a voting method in which the electors voting in an election for an elective 21office are permitted to indicate and order their preferences for all candidates whose 22names appear on the ballot for the same office or seat.SB1130,7,21(2) Except as provided in ss. 8.05 (1) (L) and 9.10 (3) (d) and (e) and (4) (f), all 2elections shall be conducted using ranked-choice voting.SB1130,7,113(3) An elector may rank as many preferences for each office as there are 4candidates for the office whose names appear on the ballot. If more than one seat 5on a governing body is to be filled at large, the procedure under s. 7.62 (3) applies. 6If write-in votes are permitted, an elector may vote for a write-in candidate in 7addition to any candidate whose name appears on the ballot. To indicate a 8preference, an elector shall mark his or her ballot with or cause the voting machine 9to indicate the elector’s first choice, 2nd choice, 3rd choice, and subsequent choices, 10if any. An elector is not required to indicate a choice and is not required to indicate 11as many choices as the elector is eligible to indicate.SB1130,1112Section 11. 5.58 of the statutes is repealed.SB1130,1213Section 12. 5.60 (1) (ag) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1130,7,22145.60 (1) (ag) There shall be one separate ballot for state superintendent, 15judicial officers, county executive, county comptroller in counties having a 16population of 750,000 or more, and county supervisor, except as authorized in s. 175.655. For county supervisor, the ballot shall be prepared in accordance with ss. 185.58 (2) and s. 59.10 (3). Arrangement of the names of candidates for county 19executive, county comptroller, county supervisor, and municipal judge, if the judge 20is elected under s. 755.01 (4), shall be determined by the county clerk or the 21executive director of the county board of election commissioners determining ballot 22arrangement under s. 5.58 (1c), in the manner prescribed in par. (b).SB1130,1323Section 13. 5.64 (1) (ar) 1m. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1130,8,415.64 (1) (ar) 1m. When voting for president and vice president, the ballot shall 2permit an elector to vote only for the candidates on one ticket jointly or to write in 3the names of persons in both spaces, except that the elector may rank his or her 4preference for each set of candidates as provided under s. 5.20.SB1130,145Section 14. 5.64 (1) (ar) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1130,8,965.64 (1) (ar) 2. When voting for governor and lieutenant governor, the ballot 7shall permit an elector to vote only for the candidates on one ticket jointly or write 8in the names of persons in both spaces, except that the elector may rank his or her 9preference for each set of candidates as provided under s. 5.20.SB1130,1510Section 15. 5.66 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1130,8,18115.66 (1) For local elections, where necessary, municipal clerks shall have 12sufficient ballots printed or otherwise prepared whenever a voting system does not 13utilize printed ballots to assure a ballot for all electors or voting machines. For all 14other elections the municipal clerks shall certify to their county clerk, on the first 15day of the 2nd month preceding the month in which the primary election is held, the 16approximate number of electors in the municipality. The county clerk shall total 17these estimates and order a sufficient supply to assure ballots for all electors and 18voting machines.SB1130,1619Section 16. 5.68 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1130,9,3205.68 (5) If a charge is made for the use of a polling place, the charge shall be 21paid by the municipality establishing the polling place under s. 5.25 (2) unless the 22polling place is used to conduct a special election that is called by a unit of 23government other than the state or the municipality establishing the polling place 1and the special election is not held concurrently with an election specified in s. 5.02 2(5), (12s), or (21), or (22). In such case the charge shall be paid by the unit of 3government that calls the special election.SB1130,174Section 17. 6.80 (2) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB1130,9,1656.80 (2) (g) In elections for offices or seats on a governing body at which 6ranked-choice voting under s. 5.20 is used, an elector may rank as many preferences 7for each office or seat as there are candidates whose names appear on the ballot for 8that office or seat. If more than one office or seat on a governing body is to be filled 9at large, an elector may rank as many preferences for that office or seat as there are 10candidates whose names appear on the ballot for all of the offices or seats to be 11filled. If write-in votes are permitted, an elector may vote for a write-in candidate 12in addition to any candidate whose name appears on the ballot. An elector who 13indicates preferences for candidates for an office or seat shall indicate a different 14preference for each candidate for that office or seat. If an elector casts more than 15one vote for any office or seat without indicating preferences, the elector’s intent 16shall be determined as provided under s. 7.62 (4).SB1130,1817Section 18. 7.08 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1130,9,22187.08 (1) (c) Prescribe forms required by ss. 6.24 (3) and (4), 6.30 (4) and (5), 196.33 (1), 6.47 (1) (am) 2. and (3), 6.55 (2), and 6.86 (2) to (3), and 7.62 (1m). All such 20forms shall contain a statement of the penalty applicable to false or fraudulent 21registration or voting through use of the form. Forms are not required to be 22furnished by the commission.SB1130,1923Section 19. 7.10 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1130,10,817.10 (6) Municipal judge; certified list. If candidates for the office of a 2municipal judge who is elected under s. 755.01 (4) file nomination papers in the 3office of the county clerk and any municipality served by the judge prepares its own 4ballots for voting machines or an electronic voting system, the county clerk shall 5certify to the municipal clerk of that municipality the names of the candidates for 6judge as soon as possible after the last day for filing nomination papers and after 7certification by the county board of canvassers of the results of any primary 8election.SB1130,209Section 20. 7.50 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1130,10,16107.50 (1) (b) When an elector casts more votes for any office or measure than he 11or she is entitled to cast at an election, all the elector’s votes for that office or 12measure are invalid and the elector is deemed to have voted for none of them, except 13as provided in par. (c) and sub. (2) (d) and s. 7.62. If an elector casts less votes for 14any office or measure than he or she is entitled to cast at an election, all votes cast 15by the elector shall be counted but no vote shall be counted more than once, except 16as provided in s. 7.62. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb1130 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb1130 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1130 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1130 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB1130: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting